Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.355

Students with epilepsy or other seizure disorders—Individual health plans—Designation of professional to consult and coordinate with parents and health care provider—Training and supervision of school district personnel—Parent-designated adults.

(1) School districts shall provide individual health plans for students with epilepsy or other seizure disorders, subject to the following conditions:

(a) The board of directors of the school district shall adopt and periodically revise policies to be followed for students with epilepsy or other seizure disorders. The policies must cover, but need not be limited to, the following subjects:

(i) The acquisition of parent requests and instructions;

(ii) The acquisition of orders from licensed health professionals prescribing within the scope of their prescriptive authority for monitoring and treatment of seizure disorders at school;

(iii) The provision for storage of medical equipment and medication provided by the parent;

(iv) The establishment of school policy exceptions necessary to accommodate the students' needs related to epilepsy or other seizure disorders as described in the individual health plan;

(v) The development of individual emergency plans;

(vi) The distribution of the individual health plan to appropriate staff based on the students' needs and staff level of contact with the student;

(vii) The possession of legal documents for parent-designated adults to provide care, if needed; and

(viii) The updating of the individual health plan at least annually; and

(b) The board of directors, in the course of developing the policies in (a) of this subsection, shall consult with one or more licensed physicians or nurses, or appropriate personnel from a national epilepsy organization that offers seizure training and education for school nurses and other school personnel.

(2)(a) The board of directors shall designate a professional person licensed under chapter 18.71, 18.57, or 18.79 RCW as it applies to registered nurses and *advanced registered nurse practitioners, to consult and coordinate with the student's parents and health care provider, and train and supervise the appropriate school district personnel in proper procedures for care for students with epilepsy or other seizure disorders to ensure a safe, therapeutic learning environment. Training required under this subsection (2)(a) may also be provided by a national organization that offers training for school nurses for managing students with seizures and seizure training for school personnel.

(b)(i) Parent-designated adults who are school district employees must receive training in accordance with (a) of this subsection (2).

(ii) Parent-designated adults who are not school district employees must show evidence of training in proper procedures for care of students with epilepsy or other seizure disorders. Training required under this subsection (2)(b)(ii) may be provided by a national organization that offers training for school nurses for managing students with seizures and seizure training for school personnel.

(iii) The professional person designated under (a) of this subsection (2) is not responsible for the supervision of the parent-designated adult for procedures authorized by the parents.

(3)(a) To be eligible to be a parent-designated adult, a school district employee not licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW shall file, without coercion by the employer, a voluntary written, current, and unexpired letter of intent stating the employee's willingness to be a parent-designated adult. If a school district employee who is not licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW chooses not to file a letter under this section, the employee may not be subject to any employer reprisal or disciplinary action for refusing to file a letter.

(b)(i) For the purposes of this section, "parent-designated adult" means a parent-designated adult who: (A) Volunteers for the designation; (B) receives additional training from a health care professional or expert in care for epilepsy or other seizure disorders selected by the parents; and (C) provides care for the child consistent with the individual health plan.

(ii) A parent-designated adult may be a school district employee.

(4) Nothing in this section is intended to supersede or otherwise modify nurse delegation requirements established in RCW 18.79.260.

(5) This section applies beginning with the 2022-23 school year.

[ 2021 c 29 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.